Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Big Yellow
School Bus Act".
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.42, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.42. A. For the 2025-2026 school year, each
school district shall provide to every support employee, as defined
in paragraph 8 of Section 1-116 of this title, with a salary of less
Req. No. 11712 Page 1

than Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per year, a twenty-percent
(20%) wage increase over the base amount the employee earned during
the 2024-2025 school year if the support employee is employed by the
same school district for the 2025-2026 school year. The dollar
amount of the salary increase required by this subsection shall be
prorated based upon the number of total hours of work performed by a
full-time-equivalent support employee. If a support employee is a
new employee of the school district, his or her starting salary
shall be a twenty-percent (20%) increase from the starting salary
for the same position during the 2024-2025 school year.
B. For the 2018-19 school year, each school district shall
provide to every support employee a wage increase over the base
amount the employee earned during the 2017-18 school year if the
support employee is employed by the same school district for the
2018-19 school year in the amount of One Thousand Two Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($1,250.00). The dollar amount of salary increase
authorized by this subsection shall be prorated based upon the
number of total hours of work performed by a full-time-equivalent
support employee.
B. C. The increase increases prescribed by this section shall be
in addition to any other compensation, increase in compensation, and
fringe benefits provided by the district or state, or mandated by
law or collective bargaining agreement, unless the hours or duties
of the support employee are reduced proportionately.
Req. No. 11712 Page 2

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11712 AQH 12/09/24

















Req. No. 11712 Page 3